Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 40 INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM
1-40-118. Protest.

A protest in writing, under oath, together with three copies thereof, may be filed in the district court for the county in which the petition has been filed by some registered elector, within fifteen days after the secretary of state issues a statement as to whether the petition has a sufficient number of valid signatures, which statement must be issued no later than thirty calendar days after the petition has been filed. If the secretary of state fails to issue a statement within thirty calendar days, the petition is deemed sufficient. Regardless of whether the secretary of state has issued a statement of sufficiency or if the petition is deemed sufficient because the secretary of state has failed to issue a statement of sufficiency within thirty calendar days, no further agency action is necessary for the district court to have jurisdiction to consider the protest. During the period a petition is being examined by the secretary of state for sufficiency, the petition shall not be available to the public; except that such period must not exceed thirty calendar days. Immediately after the secretary of state issues a statement of sufficiency or, if the petition is deemed sufficient because the secretary of state has failed to issue the statement, after thirty calendar days, the secretary of state shall make the petition available to the public for copying upon request.

If the secretary of state conducted a random sample of the petitions and did not verify each signature, the protest shall set forth with particularity the defects in the procedure used by the secretary of state in the verification of the petition or the grounds for challenging individual signatures or petition sections, as well as individual signatures or petition sections protested. If the secretary of state verified each name on the petition sections, the protest shall set forth with particularity the grounds of the protest and the individual signatures or petition sections protested.

Regardless of the method used by the secretary of state to verify signatures, the grounds for challenging individual signatures or petition sections pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall include, but are not limited to, the use of a petition form that does not comply with the provisions of this article, fraud, and a violation of any provision of this article or any other law that, in either case, prevents fraud, abuse, or mistake in the petition process.

If the protest is limited to an allegation that there were defects in the secretary of state's statement of sufficiency based on a random sample to verify signatures, the district court may review all signatures in the random sample.

No signature may be challenged that is not identified in the protest by section number, line number, name, and reason why the secretary of state is in error. If any party is protesting the finding of the secretary of state regarding the registration of a signer, the protest shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the elector or a copy of the election record of the signer.

(2.5) (a) If a district court finds that there are invalid signatures or petition sections as a result of fraud committed by any person involved in petition circulation, the registered elector who instituted the proceedings may commence a civil action to recover reasonable attorney fees and costs from the person responsible for such invalid signatures or petition sections.

A registered elector who files a protest shall be entitled to the recovery of reasonable attorney fees and costs from a proponent of an initiative petition who defends the petition against a protest or the proponent's attorney, upon a determination by the district court that the defense, or any part thereof, lacked substantial justification or that the defense, or any part thereof, was interposed for delay or harassment. A proponent who defends a petition against a protest shall be entitled to the recovery of reasonable attorney fees and costs from the registered elector who files a protest or the registered elector's attorney, upon a determination by the district court that the protest, or any part thereof, lacked substantial justification or that the protest, or any part thereof, was interposed for delay or harassment. No attorney fees may be awarded under this paragraph (b) unless the district court has first considered the provisions of section 13-17-102 (5) and (6), C.R.S. For purposes of this paragraph (b), "lacked substantial justification" means substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious.

A district court conducting a hearing pursuant to this article shall permit a circulator who is not available at the time of the hearing to testify by telephone or by any other means permitted under the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 435, § 13, effective May 8, 1995.)

The secretary of state shall furnish a requesting protestor with a computer tape or microfiche listing of the names of all registered electors in the state and shall charge a fee which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., to cover the cost of furnishing the listing.

Written entries that are made by petition signers, circulators, and notaries public on a petition section that substantially comply with the requirements of this article 40 shall be deemed valid by the secretary of state or any court, unless:

Fraud, as specified in section 1-40-135 (2)(c), is established by a preponderance of the evidence;

A violation of any provision of this article or any other provision of law that, in either case, prevents fraud, abuse, or mistake in the petition process, is established by a preponderance of the evidence;

A circulator used a petition form that does not comply with the provisions of this article or has not been approved by the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 688, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 435, § 13, effective May 8.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended and (2.5) and (5) added, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1176, § 14, effective May 15.

L. 2018:

IP(5) and (5)(a) amended, (HB 18-1145), ch. 113, p. 808, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1670, § 74, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-109 as it existed prior to 1993, and provisions of the former § 1-40-118 were relocated to § 1-40-130.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1145, see section 1 of chapter 113, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

1-40-119. Procedure for hearings.

At any hearing held under this article, the party protesting the finding of the secretary of state concerning the sufficiency of signatures shall have the burden of proof. Hearings shall be had as soon as is conveniently possible and shall be concluded within thirty days after the commencement thereof, and the result of such hearings shall be forthwith certified to the designated representatives of the signers and to the protestors of the petition. The hearing shall be subject to the provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Upon application, the decision of the court shall be reviewed by the Colorado supreme court.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 689, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 436, § 14, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-109 (2)(a) as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-119 was relocated to § 1-40-132 (1).

1-40-120. Filing in federal court.

In case a complaint has been filed with the federal district court on the grounds that a petition is insufficient due to failure to comply with any federal law, rule, or regulation, the petition may be withdrawn by the two persons designated pursuant to section 1-40-104 to represent the signers of the petition and, within fifteen days after the court has issued its order in the matter, may be amended and refiled as an original petition. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the timely filing of a protest to any original petition, including one that has been amended and refiled. No person shall be entitled, pursuant to this section, to amend an amended petition.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 689, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-109 (2)(b) as it existed prior to 1993.

1-40-121. Designated representatives - expenditures related to petition circulation - report - penalty - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Expenditure" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (8) of article XXVIII of the state constitution and includes a payment to a circulator.

"False address" means the street address, post office box, city, state, or any other designation of place used in a circulator's affidavit that does not represent the circulator's correct address of permanent domicile at the time he or she circulated petitions. "False address" does not include an address that merely omits the designation of "street", "avenue", "boulevard", or any comparable term.

"Report" means the report required to be filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

No later than ten days after the date that the petition is filed with the secretary of state, the designated representatives of the proponents must submit to the secretary of state a report that:

States the dates of circulation by all circulators who were paid to circulate a section of the petition, the total hours for which each circulator was paid to circulate a section of the petition, the gross amount of wages paid for such hours, and any addresses used by circulators on their affidavits that the designated representatives or their agents have determined, prior to petition filing, to be false addresses;

Includes any other expenditures made by any person or issue committee related to the circulation of petitions for signatures. Such information shall include the name of the person or issue committee and the amount of the expenditure.

Within ten days after the date the report is filed, a registered elector may file a complaint alleging a violation of the requirements for the report set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The designated representatives of the proponents may cure the alleged violation by filing a report or an addendum to the original report within ten days after the date the complaint is filed. If the violation is not cured, an administrative law judge shall conduct a hearing on the complaint within fourteen days after the date of the additional filing or the deadline for the additional filing, whichever is sooner.

After a hearing is held, if the administrative law judge determines that the designated representatives of the proponents intentionally violated the reporting requirements of this section, the designated representatives shall be subject to a penalty that is equal to three times the amount of any expenditures that were omitted from or erroneously included in the report.

If the administrative law judge determines that the designated representatives intentionally misstated a material fact in the report or omitted a material fact from the report, or if the designated representatives never filed a report, the registered elector who instituted the proceedings may commence a civil action to recover reasonable attorney fees and costs from the designated representatives of the proponents.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any procedures related to a complaint shall be governed by the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 690, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(1) and IP(2) amended, p. 436, § 15, effective May 8.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 815, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1983, § 36, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1178, § 15, effective May 15.

L. 2011:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 11-1072), ch. 255, p. 1105, § 6, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

1-40-122. Certification of ballot titles.

The secretary of state, at the time the secretary of state certifies to the county clerk and recorder of each county the names of the candidates for state and district offices for general election, shall also certify to them the ballot titles and numbers of each initiated and referred measure filed in the office of the secretary of state to be voted upon at such election.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 690, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(2) repealed, p. 436, § 16, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) is similar to former § 1-40-112 as it existed prior to 1993.

1-40-123. Counting of votes - effective date - conflicting provisions.

The votes on all measures submitted to the people shall be counted and properly entered after the votes for candidates for office cast at the same election are counted and shall be counted, canvassed, and returned and the result determined and certified in the manner provided by law concerning other elections. The secretary of state who has certified the election shall, without delay, make and transmit to the governor a certificate of election. The measure takes effect from and after the date of the official declaration of the vote by proclamation of the governor, but not later than thirty days after the votes have been canvassed, as provided in section 1 of article V of the state constitution.

A majority of the votes cast thereon adopts any measure submitted for a proposed law, and, in case of adoption of conflicting provisions, the one that receives the greatest number of affirmative votes prevails in all particulars as to which there is a conflict.

At least fifty-five percent of the votes cast thereon adopts any measure submitted for an amendment to the state constitution; except that a majority of the votes cast thereon adopts any measure submitted for an amendment to the state constitution that only repeals in whole or in part any provision of the state constitution. In the case of adoption of conflicting provisions, the one that receives the greatest number of affirmative votes prevails in all particulars as to which there is a conflict.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 691, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 436, § 17, effective May 8.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 620, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-113 as it existed prior to 1993.

1-40-124. Publication.

In accordance with section 1 (7.3) of article V of the state constitution, the director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly shall cause to be published at least one time in at least one legal publication of general circulation in each county of the state, compactly and without unnecessary spacing, in not less than eight-point standard type, a true copy of:

The title and text of each constitutional amendment, initiated or referred measure, or part of a measure, to be submitted to the people with the number and form in which the ballot title thereof will be printed in the official ballot; and

The text of each referred or initiated question arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-102 (3), to be submitted to the people with the number and form in which such question will be printed in the official ballot.

The publication may be in the form of a notice printed in a legal newspaper, as defined in sections 24-70-102 and 24-70-103 (1), C.R.S., or in the form of a publication that is printed separately and delivered as an insert in such a newspaper. The director of research of the legislative council may determine which form the publication will take in each legal newspaper. The director may negotiate agreements with one or more legal newspapers, or with any organization that represents such newspapers, to authorize the printing of a separate insert by one or more legal newspapers to be delivered by all of the legal newspapers participating in the agreement.

Where more than one legal newspaper is circulated in a county, the director of research of the legislative council shall select the newspaper or newspapers that will make the publication. In making such selection, the director shall consider the newspapers' circulation and charges.

The amount paid for publication shall be determined by the executive committee of the legislative council and shall be based on available appropriations. In determining the amount, the executive committee may consider the newspaper's then effective current lowest bulk comparable or general rate charged and the rate specified for legal newspapers in section 24-70-107, C.R.S. The director of research of the legislative council shall provide the legal newspapers selected to perform printing in accordance with this subsection (1) either complete slick proofs or mats of the title and text of the proposed constitutional amendment, initiated or referred measure, or part of a measure, and of the text of a referred or initiated question arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-102 (3), at least one week before the publication date.

If no legal newspaper is willing or able to print or distribute the publication in a particular county in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (1), the director of research of the legislative council shall assure compliance with the publication requirements of section 1 (7.3) of article V of the state constitution by causing the printing of additional inserts or legal notices in such manner and form as deemed necessary and by providing for their separate circulation in the county as widely as may be practicable. Such circulation may include making the publications available at government offices and other public facilities or private businesses. If sufficient funds are available for such purposes, the director may also contract for alternative methods of circulation or may cause circulation by mailing the publication to county residents. Any printing and circulation made in accordance with this paragraph (e) shall be deemed to be a legal publication of general circulation for purposes of section 1 (7.3) of article V of the state constitution.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 437, § 18, effective May 8, 1995.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 691, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1688, § 1, effective January 19, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 437, § 18, effective May 8.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 298, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 961, § 1, effective May 21.

1-40-124.5. Ballot information booklet.

The director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly shall prepare a ballot information booklet for any initiated or referred constitutional amendment or legislation, including a question, as defined in section 1-41-102 (3), in accordance with section 1 (7.5) of article V of the state constitution.

The director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for every initiated or referred measure, taking into consideration fiscal impact information submitted by the office of state planning and budgeting, the department of local affairs or any other state agency, and any proponent or other interested person. The fiscal impact statement prepared for every measure shall be substantially similar in form and content to the fiscal notes provided by the legislative council of the general assembly for legislative measures pursuant to section 2-2-322. A complete copy of the fiscal impact statement for such measure shall be available through the legislative council of the general assembly. The ballot information booklet shall indicate whether there is a fiscal impact for each initiated or referred measure and shall abstract the fiscal impact statement for such measure. The abstract for every measure shall appear after the arguments for and against such measure in the analysis section of the ballot information booklet, and shall include, but shall not be limited to:

An estimate of the effect the measure will have on state and local government revenues, expenditures, taxes, and fiscal liabilities if such measure is enacted;

An estimate of the amount of any state and local government recurring expenditures or fiscal liabilities if such measure is enacted;

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1)(b)(III) is effective until proclamation of the governor. See editor's note following this section.] For any initiated or referred measure that modifies the state tax laws, if the measure would either increase or decrease individual income tax revenue or state sales tax revenue, a table that shows the number of tax filers in each income category, the total tax burden change for each income category, and the average tax burden change for each filer within each income category. If the change in a tax burden shown in the table is an increase, the change must be expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a plus sign. If the change in a tax burden shown in the table is a decrease, the change must be expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a negative sign. The table must use the following income categories:

(III)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1)(b)(III) is effective upon proclamation of the governor. See editor's note following this section.

]

For any initiated or referred measure that modifies the state tax laws, if the measure would either increase or decrease individual income tax revenue or state sales tax revenue, a table that shows the number of tax filers in each income category, the total change in the amount of tax owed for each income category, and the average change in the amount of tax owed for each filer within each income category. If the change in the amount of tax owed shown in the table is an increase, the change must be expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a plus sign. If the change in the amount of tax owed shown in the table is a decrease, the change must be expressed as a dollar amount preceded by a negative sign. The table must use the following income categories:

Federal adjusted gross income of fourteen thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars or less;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to fifteen thousand dollars and less than thirty thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to thirty thousand dollars and less than forty thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to forty thousand dollars and less than fifty thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to fifty thousand dollars and less than seventy thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to seventy thousand dollars and less than one hundred thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to one hundred thousand dollars and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to one hundred fifty thousand dollars and less than two hundred thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to two hundred thousand dollars and less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars and less than five hundred thousand dollars;

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to five hundred thousand dollars and less than one million dollars; and

Federal adjusted gross income greater than or equal to one million dollars; and

If the measure contains a proposed tax change, as defined in section 1-40-106 (3)(i)(II), that reduces state tax revenue, a description of the three largest areas of program expenditure, as defined in section 1-40-106 (3)(i)(I).

Repealed.

The director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly may update the initial fiscal impact statement prepared in accordance with section 1-40-105.5 when preparing the fiscal impact statement required by this subsection (1).

(1.5) The executive committee of the legislative council of the general assembly shall be responsible for providing the fiscal information on any ballot issue that must be included in the ballot information booklet pursuant to section 1 (7.5)(c) of article V of the state constitution.

(1.7) (a) After receiving written comments from the public in accordance with section 1 (7.5)(a)(II) of article V of the state constitution, but before the draft of the ballot information booklet is finalized, the director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly shall conduct a public meeting at which the director and other members of the legislative staff have the opportunity to ask questions that arise in response to the written comments. The director may modify the draft of the booklet in response to comments made at the hearing. The legislative council may modify the draft of the booklet upon the two-thirds affirmative vote of the members of the legislative council.

Each person submitting written comments in accordance with section 1 (7.5)(a)(II) of article V of the state constitution shall provide his or her name and the name of any organization the person represents or is affiliated with for purposes of making the comments.

The arguments for and against each measure in the analysis section of the ballot information booklet shall be preceded by the phrase: "For information on those issue committees that support or oppose the measures on the ballot at the (date and year) election, go to the Colorado secretary of state's elections center website hyperlink for ballot and initiative information (appropriate secretary of state website address).".

Following completion of the ballot information booklet, the director of research shall arrange for its distribution to every residence of one or more active registered electors in the state. Distribution may be accomplished by such means as the director of research deems appropriate to comply with section 1 (7.5) of article V of the state constitution, including, but not limited to, mailing the ballot information booklet to electors and insertion of the ballot information booklet in newspapers of general circulation in the state. The distribution shall be performed pursuant to a contract or contracts bid and entered into after employing standard competitive bidding practices including, but not limited to, the use of requests for information, requests for proposals, or any other standard vendor selection practices determined to be best suited to selecting an appropriate means of distribution and an appropriate contractor or contractors. The executive director of the department of personnel shall provide such technical advice and assistance regarding bidding procedures as deemed necessary by the director of research.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the ballot information publication and distribution revolving fund. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), moneys shall be appropriated to the fund each year by the general assembly in the annual general appropriation act. All interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the revolving fund are continuously appropriated to the legislative council of the general assembly to pay the costs of publishing the text and title of each constitutional amendment, each initiated or referred measure, or part of a measure, and the text of a referred or initiated question arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-102 (3), in at least one legal publication of general circulation in each county of the state, as required by section 1-40-124, and the costs of distributing the ballot information booklet, as required by subsection (2) of this section. Any moneys credited to the revolving fund and unexpended at the end of any given fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2007, that are unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3); except that the amount so transferred shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2008, that are unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2009, that are unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year and that are in excess of the amount of one million forty-two thousand dollars shall not revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3); except that the amount so transferred shall not exceed one million one hundred twenty-nine thousand six hundred seven dollars.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (3) to the contrary, on August 11, 2010, the state treasurer shall deduct one million one hundred twenty-nine thousand six hundred seven dollars from the ballot information publication and distribution revolving fund and transfer such sum to the redistricting account within the legislative department cash fund.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1688, § 2, effective January 19, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1511, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 384, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2000:

(1) and (3) amended and (1.5) added, p. 298, § 4, effective August 2; (1) amended, p. 1623, § 8, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 223, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 410, § 3, effective April 8.

L. 2005:

(3)(a) amended, p. 759, § 6, effective June 1; (1)(c) repealed and (1.7) added, p. 1371, §§ 2, 1, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(3)(b) amended, p. 2124, § 2, effective April 11.

L. 2008:

(3)(b) amended, p. 2325, § 2, effective April 7.

L. 2009:

(3)(c) added, (SB 09-224), ch. 441, p. 2445, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2010:

(3)(d) added, (HB 10-1367), ch. 430, p. 2240, § 2, effective April 15; (3)(e) added, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1639, § 14, effective August 11; (1.7) amended, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1240, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2015:

(1)(d) added, (HB 15-1057), ch. 198, p. 679, § 6, effective March 26, 2016.

L. 2021:

IP(1)(b), (1)(b)(II), and (1)(b)(III) amended and (1)(b)(IV) added, (HB 21-1321), ch. 474, p. 3397, § 4, effective July 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(b)(III) amended, (SB 22-222), ch. 508, p. 4277, § 4, effective (see editor's note).

1-40-125. Mailing to electors.

The requirements of this section shall apply to any ballot issue involving a local government matter arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-103 (4), for which notice is required to be mailed pursuant to section 20 (3)(b) of article X of the state constitution. A mailing is not required for a ballot issue that does not involve a local government matter arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-103 (4).

Thirty days before a ballot issue election, political subdivisions shall mail at the least cost and as a package where districts with ballot issues overlap, a titled notice or set of notices addressed to "all registered voters" at each address of one or more active registered electors. Except for voter-approved additions, notices shall include only:

The election date, hours, ballot title, text, and local election office address and telephone number;

For proposed district tax or bonded debt increases, the estimated or actual total of district fiscal year spending for the current year and each of the past four years, and the overall percentage and dollar change;

For the first full fiscal year of each proposed political subdivision tax increase, district estimates of the maximum dollar amount of each increase and of district fiscal year spending without the increase;

For proposed district bonded debt, its principal amount and maximum annual and total district repayment cost, and the principal balance of total current district bonded debt and its maximum annual and remaining local district repayment cost;

Two summaries, up to five hundred words each, one for and one against the proposal, of written comments filed with the election officer by thirty days before the election. No summary shall mention names of persons or private groups, nor any endorsements of or resolutions against the proposal. Petition representatives following these rules shall write this summary for their petition. The election officer shall maintain and accurately summarize all other relevant written comments.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a ballot issue that is subject to the provisions of section 1-40-124.5.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 692, § 1, effective May 4; (1) amended, p. 1437, § 128, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and IP(2) amended and (3) added, p. 299, § 5, effective August 2.

1-40-126. Explanation of effect of "yes/for" or "no/against" vote included in notices provided by mailing or publication.

In any notice to electors provided by the director of research of the legislative council, whether by mailing pursuant to section 1-40-124.5 or publication pursuant to section 1-40-124, there shall be included the following explanation preceding any information about individual ballot issues: "A 'yes/for' vote on any ballot issue is a vote in favor of changing current law or existing circumstances, and a 'no/against' vote on any ballot issue is a vote against changing current law or existing circumstances."

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 692, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 299, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1089), ch. 70, p. 243, § 4, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-114 (3), which was added by House Bill 93-1155. (See L. 93, p. 266.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

1-40-126.5. Explanation of ballot titles and actual text of measures in notices provided by mailing or publication.

In any notice to electors provided by the director of research of the legislative council, whether in the ballot information booklet prepared pursuant to section 1-40-124.5 or by publication pursuant to section 1-40-124, there shall be included the following explanation preceding the title of each measure:

For referred measures: "The ballot title below is a summary drafted by the professional legal staff for the general assembly for ballot purposes only. The ballot title will not appear in the (Colorado constitution/Colorado Revised Statutes). The text of the measure that will appear in the (Colorado constitution/Colorado Revised Statutes) below was referred to the voters because it passed by a (two-thirds majority/majority) vote of the state senate and the state house of representatives."

For initiated measures: "The ballot title below is a summary drafted by the professional staff of the offices of the secretary of state, the attorney general, and the legal staff for the general assembly for ballot purposes only. The ballot title will not appear in the (Colorado constitution/Colorado Revised Statutes). The text of the measure that will appear in the (Colorado constitution/Colorado Revised Statutes) below was drafted by the proponents of the initiative. The initiated measure is included on the ballot as a proposed change to current law because the proponents gathered the required amount of petition signatures."

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1035), ch. 25, p. 63, § 1, effective March 17.

1-40-127. Ordinances - effective, when - referendum. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 692, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 437, § 19, effective May 8.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to municipal government ordinances, their effective dates, and related referendums, see § 31-11-105.

1-40-128. Ordinances, how proposed - conflicting measures. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 693, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 438, § 20, effective May 8.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to proposing municipal government ordinances and conflicting measures, see § 31-11-104.

1-40-129. Voting on ordinances. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 694, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 438, § 21, effective May 8.